Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-464
Failure to obey order or resolution.

Any person subject to this code who:

(1) Violates or fails to obey any lawful general order or regulation;

(2) Having knowledge of any other lawful order issued by a member of the military forces, which it is his duty to obey, fails to obey the order; or

(3) Is derelict in the performance of his duties, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 64, p. 1577.